Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5500.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 43.216.829 and 2025 c 412 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:(1) By June 1st of every even-numbered year, the department shall publish a current cost of quality child care study, a cost of quality child care study as defined by the early educator design team, and a market rate ((study))survey and submit the ((study))information to the relevant committees of the legislature in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(a) "Cost of quality child care study as defined by the early educator design team" means using a cost estimation model, developed in consultation with and recommended by the early educator design team to the department, that includes, at a minimum, fixed costs on the following factors:(i) Staff salaries based on a living wage scale as identified by the early educator design team;(ii) Benefits, including paid leave, retirement contributions by employers, and expenses related to offering discretionary benefits to staff, such as health and life insurance;(iii) Family engagement activities, staff, or both;(iv) Planning release time;(v) Costs for educational materials and curriculum; and(vi) Professional development supports; and(b) "Current cost of quality child care study" means using a cost estimation model that includes, at a minimum, current costs on the following factors:(i) Staff salaries;(ii) Benefits;(iii) Family engagement activities;(iv) Planning release time;(v) Costs for educational materials and curriculum; and(vi) Professional development supports.--- END ---